District of Columbia statutes.
29-1002.02

Signing and filing of records pursuant to judicial order.

(a)

If a person required by this chapter to sign or deliver a record to the Mayor for filing does not do so, any other person that is aggrieved may petition the Superior Court to order:

(1)

The person to sign the record; or

(2)

The person to deliver the record to the Mayor for filing; or

(3)

The Mayor to file the record unsigned.

(b)

If the petitioner under subsection (a) of this section is not the limited cooperative association or foreign cooperative to which the record pertains, the petitioner shall make the association or cooperative a party to the action.

(c)

A record filed pursuant to this section is effective without being signed.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(3)(B), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 rewrote the section.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 202 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.